North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
North Carolina Commentary

This revision of the North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act (hereinafter the “Act”) is based in large part upon the North Carolina Business Corporation Act (hereinafter “BCA”). Accordingly, the Act follows the same general organization and numbering system as the BCA and, where appropriate, incorporates the substance of the BCA. Stylistic or other minor differences in language and form between certain sections of the Act and the sections of the BCA from which they are derived are not intended to imply substantive differences.

Although the drafters reviewed the Revised Model Nonprofit Corporation Act (1987) (hereinafter the “Model Act”) and adopted certain of its provisions, the Act is substantially different from the Model Act. For that reason, the Official Comments to the Model Act are not included in this commentary.

The North Carolina comments are designed to note significant substantive changes from prior law, to highlight certain provisions of the Act that had no counterpart in the prior law and to explain certain provisions of the Act. For any section of the Act that is the same or substantially the same as the corresponding section of the BCA, it is appropriate to refer to the comments to the corresponding BCA section.